Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1289
Violations; penalty.

It shall be a Class III misdemeanor to (1) operate in this state a motorboat
for which a certificate of title is required without having a certificate
of title or upon which the certificate of title has been canceled, (2) acquire,
purchase, hold, or display for sale a new motorboat without having obtained
a manufacturer's or importer's certificate or a certificate of title therefor,
(3) fail to surrender any certificate of title or any certificate of number
upon cancellation of the certificate by the county treasurer or the Department
of Motor Vehicles and notice thereof, (4) fail to surrender the certificate
of title to the county treasurer in
case of the destruction or dismantling or change of a motorboat in such respect
that it is not the motorboat described in the certificate of title, (5) purport
to sell or transfer a motorboat without delivering to the purchaser or transferee
of the motorboat a certificate of title if required or a manufacturer's or
importer's certificate thereto duly assigned to the purchaser, (6) knowingly
alter or deface a certificate of title, or (7) violate any of the other provisions
of sections 37-1275 to 37-1287.

Laws 1994, LB 123, § 17;

Laws 1996, LB 464, § 25;

Laws 1997, LB 720, § 8;

Laws 2012, LB801, § 24.